Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB603.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "organization" means any organization identified in 36
U.S.C. sec. 20101 et seq. that consists of youth members or offers programming
to youth of an educational, civic, character-building, patriotic, or moral nature,
which does not disrupt the educational process.
(2) An organization may submit a request to the superintendent of a school district to
allow representatives of the organization to provide oral, printed, or oral and
printed information regarding the organization, including information regarding
how the organization furthers the educational interests and civic involvement of
students consistent with character education provided under KRS 158.005, civic
literacy under KRS 158.141, and moral instruction under KRS 158.200 to
158.260, to students of the school district on school property.
(3) Upon request by an organization pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the
superintendent of a district shall provide an opportunity at each school at least
one (1) time during each school year on a specific school day and at a time as
approved by the superintendent or his or her designee for the representatives of
an organization to provide information to students on school property.
(4) The information provided to students under this section may include:
(a) Presentations in each classroom, presentations during lunchtime, or a
presentation during a special assembly; and
(b) Printed information provided to each student, produced at the
organization’s expense.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/14/2025 9:20 AM Jacketed